Missouri, session 2026, HB2338.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 454, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 454.488, to read as follows:
454.488. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Putative father", the alleged or presumed father of a child, including a
person who has filed a notice of intent to claim paternity with the putative father
registry established under section 192.016 and a person who has filed a voluntary
acknowledgment of paternity under section 193.087;
(2) "Unborn child", the offspring of human beings from the moment of
conception until birth and at every stage of biological development, including the human
conceptus, zygote, morula, blastocyst, embryo, and fetus.
2. A putative father, or a biological father if paternity has been established, may
be obligated to make child support payments for an unborn child if the mother of the
child petitions the court for child support within two years of the child's birth and
requests that support payments include the months the mother was pregnant with the
child. If paternity is disputed, a biological father owes no duty under this section until
the biological father's paternity is established.
3. Child support obligations shall begin six weeks from conception, as
determined by the mother's physician. Payments for such obligations may be
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2338 2
retroactively collected or awarded, including in the case in which paternity is
established subsequent to the birth of the child.
4. The payment amount for such obligations shall be determined by a court, in
consultation with the mother, taking into account the best interests of the mother and
child.
5. If, after the child is born, paternity is established to belong to someone other
than the putative father, the putative father may bring a cause of action against the
actual father for reimbursement of any child support paid by the putative father under
this section.
✔